Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 12
PROHIBITION OF LOCAL LIMITS ON THE
FREQUENCY OF RELIGIOUS MEETINGS IN HOMES

29-1-1201. Legislative declaration - matter of statewide concern.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the imposition of restrictions by a local government upon when or how often individuals may meet upon private residential property to pray, worship, or otherwise study or discuss issues relating to religious beliefs infringes upon the fundamental right to the free exercise of religion. The general assembly further finds and declares that such restrictions are of significant interest to people living outside the jurisdiction of the local government. In addition, the ability of individuals to freely determine when and how often they wish to meet for such purposes should be uniform throughout the state. Accordingly, the general assembly finds that restrictions that specifically limit when or how often individuals may meet upon private residential property to pray, worship, or otherwise study or discuss issues relating to religious beliefs are a matter of statewide concern and the provisions of this section shall preempt any provisions of any local government ordinance, resolution, regulation, or other restriction to the contrary.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 26, § 1, effective August 2.

29-1-1202. Local limits on time or frequency of religious meetings - definitions.

On or after August 2, 2000, a local government shall be prohibited from enacting or enforcing any ordinance, resolution, regulation, or other restriction that specifically limits when or how frequently individuals in the state may meet upon private residential property to pray, worship, or otherwise study or discuss issues related to religious beliefs. For the purposes of this part 12, the term "local government" shall mean any county, city and county, city, or town, including any county, city and county, city, or town that has adopted a home rule charter.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 27, § 1, effective August 2.

29-1-1203. Applicability to other local laws.

This part 12 shall not be construed to affect the enactment or enforcement of laws generally regulating traffic, parking, excessive noise, or other adverse conditions affecting the health, welfare, and safety of citizens of a local government.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 27, § 1, effective August 2.